Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-3101
Act, how cited.

Sections 18-3101 to 18-3105 shall be known and may be cited as the Municipal Custodianship for Dissolved Homeowners Associations Act.

Laws 2015, LB304, § 1.